District of Columbia statutes.
1-309.09

Conduct of elections.

(a)

The Board is authorized to conduct the elections provided for in this part and to adopt, amend, repeal, and enforce such regulations as are deemed necessary to carry out the provisions of this part. The Board shall conduct such elections in the same manner as elections held under subchapter I of Chapter 10 of this title.

(b)

For the purposes of this part, the term “registered qualified elector” means a qualified elector, as defined in § 1-1001.02, registered under § 1-1001.07.

History

Oct. 10, 1975, D.C. Law 1-21, § 11, 22 DCR 2072
June 19, 1976, D.C. Law 1-72, § 7, 23 DCR 578

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-260.
1973 Ed., § 1-171h.